Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 3. Judiciary.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relating to retention elections for judges, see art. IV, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

46 Am. Jur. 2d, Judges, §§ 7, 9, 10.

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 1 et seq.

48 C.J.S., Judges, §§ 12, 13.

Sec. 15.35.030.
Approval or rejection of supreme court justice.

Each supreme court justice shall be subject to approval or rejection at the first general election held more than three years after the justice’s appointment.
If approved, the justice shall thereafter be subject to approval or rejection in a like manner every tenth year.

History.

(§ 7.51 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.35.040.
Filing declaration by supreme court justice.

Each justice seeking retention in office shall file with the director a declaration of candidacy for retention no later than August 1 before the general election at which approval or rejection is requisite.

History.

(§ 7.52 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 148 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.35.041.
Requirement of filing fee for supreme court candidate.

At the time the declaration is filed, each candidate for retention shall pay a filing fee to the director. The filing fee for a candidate for retention on the supreme court is $100.

History.

(§ 23 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 149 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.35.050.
Placing name of supreme court justice on ballot.

The director shall place the name of a supreme court justice who has properly filed a declaration of candidacy for retention on the ballot in each judicial district of the state for the general election at which approval is sought.

History.

(§ 7.53 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 1969; am § 150 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 26 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Sec. 15.35.053.
Approval or rejection of a judge of the court of appeals.

Each judge of the court of appeals shall be subject to approval or rejection at the first general election held more than three years after the judge’s appointment.
If approved, the judge is thereafter subject to approval or rejection in a like manner every eighth year.

History.

(§ 151 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.35.055.
Filing declaration by judge of the court of appeals.

Each judge of the court of appeals seeking retention in office shall file with the director a declaration of candidacy for retention no later than August 1 before the general election at which approval or rejection is requisite.

History.

(§ 151 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.35.057.
Requirement of filing fee for court of appeals.

At the time the declaration is filed, each candidate for retention shall pay a filing fee to the director. The filing fee for a candidate for retention on the court of appeals is $100.

History.

(§ 151 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.35.059.
Placing name of judge of the court of appeals on ballot.

The director shall place the name of a judge of the court of appeals who has properly filed a declaration of candidacy for retention on the ballot in each judicial district of the state for the general election at which approval is sought.

History.

(§ 151 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Sec. 15.35.060.
Approval or rejection of superior court judge.

Each superior court judge shall be subject to approval or rejection at the first general election held more than three years after the judge’s appointment.
If approved, the judge shall thereafter be subject to approval or rejection in a like manner every sixth year.

History.

(§ 7.54 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.35.070.
Filing declaration by superior court judge.

Each judge seeking retention in office shall file with the director a declaration of candidacy for retention no later than August 1 before the general election at which approval or rejection is requisite.

History.

(§ 7.55 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 152 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.35.071.
Requirement of filing fee for superior court candidate.

At the time the declaration is filed, each candidate for retention shall pay a filing fee to the director. The filing fee for a candidate for retention on the superior court is $30.

History.

(§ 24 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 153 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.35.080.
Determination of judicial district in which to seek approval.

The judge shall seek approval in the judicial district to which the judge was originally appointed, except in case of assignments and transfers with the judge’s consent, in which case the judge shall seek approval in the district where the judge has served the major portion of the judge’s term.
The judge shall designate on the declaration of candidacy the judicial district to which the judge was appointed, except in case of assignments and transfers in which case the judge shall designate the district where the judge has served the major portion of the judge’s term.

History.

(§ 7.56 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.35.090.
Placing name of superior court judge on ballot.

The director shall place the name of a superior court judge who has properly filed a declaration of candidacy for retention on the ballot in the judicial district designated in the declaration of candidacy for the general election at which approval is sought.

History.

(§ 7.57 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 1969; am § 154 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 28 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Sec. 15.35.100.
Approval or rejection of district judge.

Each district judge shall be subject to approval or rejection at the first general election held more than two years after the judge’s appointment under the provisions of AS

22.15.170

. If approved, the judge shall thereafter be subject to approval or rejection in a like manner every fourth year.

The district judge shall seek approval in the judicial district in which the judge was originally appointed, or in the district where the judge has served the major portion of the judge’s term. The district judge shall designate on the declaration of candidacy the judicial district in which the judge was appointed, or the district where the judge has served the major portion of the judge’s term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1990)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 89, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendment to (a) of this section applies “to district court judges who enter into the duties of the office on or after September 2, 1990.”

Sec. 15.35.110.
Filing declaration by district judge.

Each district judge seeking retention in office shall file with the director a declaration of candidacy for retention no later than August 1 before the general election at which approval or rejection is requisite.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1966; am § 155 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 85 SLA 1986)

Sec. 15.35.120.
Requirement of filing fee for district court candidate.

At the time the declaration is filed, each candidate for retention on the district court shall pay a filing fee of $30 to the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1966; am § 156 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.35.130.
Placing name of district judge on ballot.

The director shall place the name of a district judge who has properly filed a declaration of candidacy for retention on the ballot in the judicial district designated in the declaration of candidacy for the general election at which approval is sought.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 18 SLA 1969; am § 157 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 29 ch 67 SLA 1989)

Sec. 15.35.135.
Withdrawal of candidacy; removal of name from general election ballot.

Notice of withdrawal of candidacy for retention for a supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals, superior court judge, or district court judge must be in writing over the signature of the candidate.

The name of a candidate for retention for supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals, superior court judge, or district court judge must appear on the general election ballot unless notice under (a) of this section of withdrawal of candidacy is received by the director at least 64 days before the date of the general election.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 2007; am § 29 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (b), substituted “64 days” for “48 days” near the end of the subsection.

Secs. 15.35.140 — 15.35.170.
Judges of the court of appeals: Requirements for retention in office. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.35.053 — 15.35.059.]